Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Article 6. Ethics Orientation Sessions.

§ 30-129.1.
Orientation sessions on ethics and conflicts of interests.

The Council shall conduct an orientation session (i) for new and returning General Assembly members preceding each even-numbered year regular session and (ii) for any new General Assembly member who is elected in a special election and whose term commences after the date of the orientation session provided for in clause (i) and at least six months before the date of the next such orientation session within three months of his election. Attendance at the full orientation session shall be mandatory for newly elected members. Attendance at a refresher session shall be mandatory for returning members and may be accomplished by online participation. There shall be no penalty for the failure of a member to attend the full or refresher orientation session, but the member must disclose his attendance pursuant to § 30-111.

History.

2014, cc. 792, 804; 2017, cc. 829, 832.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 829 and 832 are identical, and deleted “Virginia Conflict of Interest and Ethics Advisory” preceding “Council” in the first sentence and deleted “lasting at least two hours” following “refresher session” in the third sentence.

§ 30-129.2.
Content of orientation sessions.

The orientation session shall provide information and training for the members on ethics and conflicts of interests, on the provisions of the General Assembly Conflicts of Interests Act (§ 30-100 et seq.), on relevant federal law provisions, and on related issues involving lobbying. Refresher sessions may be offered online.

History.

2014, cc. 792, 804.

§ 30-129.3.
Orientation session preparations.

Those conducting the orientation sessions may call on other agencies in the legislative or executive branches for assistance, may invite experts to assist in the sessions, and shall, upon request of a member who holds a professional license or certification, apply for continuing education credits with the appropriate licensing or certifying entity for the sessions.

History.

2014, cc. 792, 804.